Virginia statutes. Title 17.1. Courts of Record.
Article 7. Fees.
§ 17.1-275.
Fees collected by clerks of circuit courts; generally.

A clerk of a circuit court shall, for services performed by virtue of his office, charge the following fees:

[Repealed.]

For recording and indexing in the proper book any writing and all matters therewith, or for recording and indexing anything not otherwise provided for, $18 for an instrument or document consisting of 10 or fewer pages or sheets; $32 for an instrument or document consisting of 11 to 30 pages or sheets; and $52 for an instrument or document consisting of 31 or more pages or sheets. Whenever any writing to be recorded includes plat or map sheets no larger than eight and one-half inches by 14 inches, such plat or map sheets shall be counted as ordinary pages for the purpose of computing the recording fee due pursuant to this section. A fee of $17 per page or sheet shall be charged with respect to plat or map sheets larger than eight and one-half inches by 14 inches. Only a single fee as authorized by this subdivision shall be charged for recording a certificate of satisfaction that releases the original deed of trust and any corrected or revised deeds of trust. Three dollars and fifty cents of the fee collected for recording and indexing shall be designated for use in preserving the permanent records of the circuit courts. The sum collected for this purpose shall be administered by The Library of Virginia in cooperation with the circuit court clerks.

For appointing and qualifying any personal representative, committee, trustee, guardian, or other fiduciary, in addition to any fees for recording allowed by this section, $20 for estates not exceeding $50,000, $25 for estates not exceeding $100,000 and $30 for estates exceeding $100,000. No fee shall be charged for estates of $5,000 or less.

For entering and granting and for issuing any license, other than a marriage license or a hunting and fishing license, and administering an oath when necessary, $10.

For issuing a marriage license, attaching certificate, administering or receiving all necessary oaths or affidavits, indexing and recording, $10. For recording an order to celebrate the rites of marriage pursuant to §

20-25

, $25 to be paid by the petitioner.

For making out any bond, other than those under §

17.1-267

or subdivision A 4, administering all necessary oaths and writing proper affidavits, $3.

For all services rendered by the clerk in any garnishment or attachment proceeding, the clerk’s fee shall be $15 in cases not exceeding $500 and $25 in all other cases.

For making out a copy of any paper, record, or electronic record to go out of the office, which is not otherwise specifically provided for herein, a fee of $0.50 for each page or, if an electronic record, each image. From such fees, the clerk shall reimburse the locality the costs of making out the copies and pay the remaining fees directly to the Commonwealth. The funds to recoup the cost of making out the copies shall be deposited with the county or city treasurer or Director of Finance, and the governing body shall budget and appropriate such funds to be used to support the cost of copies pursuant to this subdivision. For purposes of this section, the costs of making out the copies authorized under this section shall include costs included in the lease and maintenance agreements for the equipment and the technology needed to operate electronic systems in the clerk’s office used to make out the copies, but shall not include salaries or related benefits. The costs of copies shall otherwise be determined in accordance with §

2.2-3704

. However, there shall be no charge to the recipient of a final order or decree to send an attested copy to such party.

For annexing the seal of the court to any paper, writing the certificate of the clerk accompanying it, the clerk shall charge $2 and for attaching the certificate of the judge, if the clerk is requested to do so, the clerk shall charge an additional $0.50.

In any case in which a person is convicted of a violation of any provision of Article 1 (§

18.2-247

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2 or is subject to a disposition under §

18.2-251

, the clerk shall assess a fee of $150 for each felony conviction and each felony disposition under §

18.2-251

which shall be taxed as costs to the defendant and shall be paid into the Drug Offender Assessment and Treatment Fund.

In any case in which a person is convicted of a violation of any provision of Article 1 (§

18.2-247

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2 or is subject to a disposition under §

18.2-251

, the clerk shall assess a fee for each misdemeanor conviction and each misdemeanor disposition under § 18.2-251, which shall be taxed as costs to the defendant and shall be paid into the Drug Offender Assessment and Treatment Fund as provided in §

17.1-275.8

.

Upon the defendant’s being required to successfully complete traffic school, a mature driver motor vehicle crash prevention course, or a driver improvement clinic in lieu of a finding of guilty, the court shall charge the defendant fees and costs as if he had been convicted.

In all civil actions that include one or more claims for the award of monetary damages the clerk’s fee chargeable to the plaintiff shall be $100 in cases seeking recovery not exceeding $49,999; $200 in cases seeking recovery exceeding $49,999, but not exceeding $100,000; $250 in cases seeking recovery exceeding $100,000, but not exceeding $500,000; and $300 in cases seeking recovery exceeding $500,000. Ten dollars of each such fee shall be apportioned to the Courts Technology Fund established under §

17.1-132

. A fee of $25 shall be paid by the plaintiff at the time of instituting a condemnation case, in lieu of any other fees. There shall be no fee charged for the filing of a cross-claim or setoff in any pending action. However, the fees prescribed by this subdivision shall be charged upon the filing of a counterclaim or a claim impleading a third-party defendant. The fees prescribed above shall be collected upon the filing of papers for the commencement of civil actions. This subdivision shall not be applicable to cases filed in the Supreme Court of Virginia.

In addition to the fees chargeable for civil actions, for the costs of proceedings for judgments by confession under §§

8.01-432

through

8.01-440

, the clerk shall tax as costs (i) the cost of registered or certified mail; (ii) the statutory writ tax, in the amount required by law to be paid on a suit for the amount of the confessed judgment; (iii) for the sheriff for serving each copy of the order entering judgment, $12; and (iv) for docketing the judgment and issuing executions thereon, the same fees as prescribed in subdivision A 17.

For qualifying notaries public, including the making out of the bond and any copies thereof, administering the necessary oaths, and entering the order, $10.

For each habeas corpus proceeding, the clerk shall receive $10 for all services required thereunder. This subdivision shall not be applicable to such suits filed in the Supreme Court of Virginia.

For docketing and indexing a judgment from any other court of the Commonwealth, for docketing and indexing a judgment in the new name of a judgment debtor pursuant to the provisions of §

8.01-451

, but not when incident to a divorce, for noting and filing the assignment of a judgment pursuant to §

8.01-452

, a fee of $5; and for issuing an abstract of any recorded judgment, when proper to do so, a fee of $5; and for filing, docketing, indexing and mailing notice of a foreign judgment, a fee of $20.

For all services rendered by the clerk in any court proceeding for which no specific fee is provided by law, the clerk shall charge $10, to be paid by the party filing said papers at the time of filing; however, this subdivision shall not be applicable in a divorce cause prior to and including the entry of a decree of divorce from the bond of matrimony.

19, 20. [Repealed.]

In accordance with §

17.1-281

, the clerk shall collect fees under subdivisions A 7, A 13, A 16, A 18 if applicable, A 20, A 22, A 24, A 26, A 29, and A 31 to be designated for courthouse construction, renovation or maintenance.

In accordance with §

17.1-278

, the clerk shall collect fees under subdivisions A 7, A 13, A 16, A 18 if applicable, A 20, A 22, A 24, A 26, A 29, and A 31 to be designated for services provided for the poor, without charge, by a nonprofit legal aid program.

In accordance with §

42.1-70

, the clerk shall collect fees under subdivisions A 7, A 13, A 16, A 18 if applicable, A 20, A 22, A 24, A 26, A 29, and A 31 to be designated for public law libraries.

All fees collected pursuant to subdivision A 27 and §

17.1-276

shall be deposited by the clerk into a special revenue fund held by the clerk, which will restrict the funds to their statutory purpose.

The provisions of this section shall control the fees charged by clerks of circuit courts for the services above described.

13a.

For the filing of any petition seeking court approval of a settlement where no action has yet been filed, the clerk’s fee, chargeable to the petitioner, shall be $50, to be paid by the petitioner at the time of filing the petition.

21.

For making the endorsements on a forthcoming bond and recording the matters relating to such bond pursuant to the provisions of §

8.01-529

, $1.

22.

For all services rendered by the clerk in any proceeding pursuant to §

57-8

or

57-15

, $10.

23.

For preparation and issuance of a subpoena duces tecum, $5.

24.

For all services rendered by the clerk in matters under §

8.01-217

relating to change of name, $20; however, this subdivision shall not be applicable in cases where the change of name is incident to a divorce.

25.

For providing court records or documents on microfilm, per frame, $0.50.

26.

In all divorce and separate maintenance proceedings, and all civil actions that do not include one or more claims for the award of monetary damages, the clerk’s fee chargeable to the plaintiff shall be $60, $10 of which shall be apportioned to the Courts Technology Fund established under §

17.1-132

to be paid by the plaintiff at the time of instituting the suit, which shall include the furnishing of a duly certified copy of the final decree. The fees prescribed by this subdivision shall be charged upon the filing of a counterclaim or a claim impleading a third-party defendant. However, no fee shall be charged for (i) the filing of a cross-claim or setoff in any pending suit or (ii) the filing of a counterclaim or any other responsive pleading in any annulment, divorce, or separate maintenance proceeding. In divorce cases, when there is a merger of a divorce of separation a mensa et thoro into a decree of divorce a vinculo, the above mentioned fee shall include the furnishing of a duly certified copy of both such decrees.

27.

For the acceptance of credit or debit cards in lieu of money to collect and secure all fees, including filing fees, fines, restitution, forfeiture, penalties and costs, the clerk shall collect from the person presenting such credit or debit card a reasonable convenience fee for the processing of such credit or debit card. Such convenience fee shall not exceed four percent of the amount paid for the transaction or a flat fee of $2 per transaction. The clerk may set a lower convenience fee for electronic filing of civil or criminal proceedings pursuant to §

17.1-258.3

. Nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit the clerk from outsourcing the processing of credit and debit card transactions to a third-party private vendor engaged by the clerk. Convenience fees shall be used to cover operational expenses as defined in §

17.1-295

.

28.

For the return of any check unpaid by the financial institution on which it was drawn or notice is received from the credit or debit card issuer that payment will not be made for any reason, the clerk may collect a fee of $50 or 10 percent of the amount of the payment, whichever is greater.

29.

For all services rendered, except in cases in which costs are assessed pursuant to §

17.1-275.1

,

17.1-275.2

,

17.1-275.3

, or

17.1-275.4

, in an adoption proceeding, a fee of $20, in addition to the fee imposed under §

63.2-1246

, to be paid by the petitioner or petitioners. For each petition for adoption filed pursuant to §

63.2-1201

, except those filed pursuant to subdivisions 4 and 5 of §

63.2-1210

, an additional $50 filing fee as required under §

63.2-1201

shall be deposited in the Virginia Birth Father Registry Fund pursuant to §

63.2-1249

.

30.

For issuing a duplicate license for one lost or destroyed as provided in §

29.1-334

, a fee in the same amount as the fee for the original license.

31.

For the filing of any petition as provided in §§

33.2-1023

,

33.2-1024

, and

33.2-1027

, a fee of $5 to be paid by the petitioner; and for the recordation of a certificate or copy thereof, as provided for in §

33.2-1021

, as well as for any order of the court relating thereto, the clerk shall charge the same fee as for recording a deed as provided for in this section, to be paid by the party upon whose request such certificate is recorded or order is entered.

32.

For making up, certifying and transmitting original record pursuant to the Rules of the Supreme Court, including all papers necessary to be copied and other services rendered, except in cases in which costs are assessed pursuant to §

17.1-275.1

,

17.1-275.2

,

17.1-275.3

,

17.1-275.4

,

17.1-275.7

,

17.1-275.8

, or

17.1-275.9

, a fee of $20.

33.

[Repealed.]

34.

For filings, etc., under the Uniform Federal Lien Registration Act (§

55.1-653

et seq.), the fees shall be as prescribed in that Act.

35.

[Repealed.]

36.

For recordation of certificate and registration of names of nonresident owners in accordance with § 59.1-74, a fee of $10.

37.

For maintaining the information required under the Overhead High Voltage Line Safety Act (§ 59.1-406 et seq.), the fee as prescribed in § 59.1-411.

38.

For lodging, indexing, and preserving a will in accordance with §

64.2-409

, a fee of $5.

39.

For filing a financing statement in accordance with §

8.9A-505

, the fee shall be as prescribed under §

8.9A-525

.

40.

For filing a termination statement in accordance with §

8.9A-513

, the fee shall be as prescribed under §

8.9A-525

.

41.

For filing assignment of security interest in accordance with §

8.9A-514

, the fee shall be as prescribed under §

8.9A-525

.

42.

For filing a petition as provided in §§

64.2-2001

and

64.2-2013

, the fee shall be $10.

43.

For issuing any execution, and recording the return thereof, a fee of $1.50.

44.

For the preparation and issuance of a summons for interrogation by an execution creditor, a fee of $5. If there is no outstanding execution, and one is requested herewith, the clerk shall be allowed an additional fee of $1.50, in accordance with subdivision A 44.

History.

Code 1950, § 14-123, p. 614; 1952, c. 146; 1954, c. 138; 1956, c. 217; 1964, c. 386, § 14.1-112; 1966, c. 217; 1970, c. 522; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 95; 1972, cc. 626, 627, 647; 1973, c. 159; 1974, cc. 370, 523; 1975, c. 226; 1976, c. 344; 1977, cc. 449, 463; 1978, c. 502; 1980, c. 145; 1983, c. 103; 1984, cc. 225, 356; 1985, cc. 94, 201; 1986, c. 538; 1988, cc. 49, 52; 1989, c. 595; 1990, cc. 88, 738, 971; 1992, c. 784; 1993, cc. 95, 299, 386; 1994, cc. 64, 432, 498, 842; 1995, cc. 51, 371, 440, 463, 525, § 14.1-111.1; 1996, cc. 344, 976; 1997, cc. 215, 921; 1998, cc. 783, 840, 872; 1999, cc. 9, 1003; 2000, cc. 826, 830; 2001, cc. 481, 496, 501, 836; 2002, cc. 831, 832; 2004, c. 1004; 2005, cc. 373, 681; 2006, cc. 318, 623, 718, 825; 2007, cc. 548, 626, 646; 2009, c. 594; 2010, c. 874; 2011, cc. 707, 890; 2012, cc. 420, 714, 780; 2013, c. 263; 2014, c. 282; 2015, c. 641; 2017, c. 200; 2020, cc. 68, 69, 589, 653; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 427; 2022, c. 377.

Cross references.

As to the Regional Criminal Justice Academy Training Fund, see §

9.1-106

.

As to fees for home studies, investigations, visitations and reports incident to adoption matters, notwithstanding the provisions of this section, see §

63.2-1248

.

As to parental duty of support, see §

64.2-1801

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1997, c. 921, cl. 2 provides: “That this act shall become effective January 1, 1998. The powers granted and duties imposed pursuant to this act shall apply prospectively to guardians and conservators appointed by court order entered on or after that date, or modified on or after that date if the court so directs, without regard to when the petition was filed. The procedures specified in this act governing proceedings for appointment of a guardian or conservator or termination or other modification of a guardianship or conservatorship shall apply on and after that date without regard to when the petition therefor was filed or the guardianship or conservatorship created.”

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act passed by the 2006 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.” The funding was provided in the 2006 appropriation act. See Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3.

References in this section were updated at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission to conform to the recodification of Title 33.2 by Acts 2014, c. 805, effective October 1, 2014.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitutions were made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “55.1-653” for “55-142.1” and “55.1-1211 or

55.1-1401

” for “55-218.1.”

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendment by c. 9 deleted subdivision 10 a, which read: “Upon conviction in felony cases or when a felony defendant’s suspension of sentence and probation is revoked pursuant to §

19.2-306

, other than a revocation for failure to pay prior court costs, the clerk shall charge the defendant thirty-six dollars in each case, one dollar of which shall be forwarded to the State Treasurer for deposit in the Regional Criminal Justice Academy Training Fund as provided in § 9-178.2, to be used for financial support of the regional criminal justice training academies,” redesignated subdivision 10 b as present subdivision 10; in present subdivision 10, substituted “In any case” for “In addition, in each case,” deleted “(i)” preceding “a fee,” deleted “and” at the end of clause (i), and deleted clause (ii), which read: “a fee of $100 per case for any forensic laboratory analysis performed for use in prosecution of such violation which shall be taxed as costs to the defendant and shall be paid into the general fund of the state treasury”; deleted subdivision 10 c, which read: “In addition, in all felony cases, including the revocation of suspension of sentence and probation held pursuant to §

19.2-306

, other than a revocation for failure to pay prior court costs, the clerk shall collect and tax as costs (i) the expense of reporting or recording the trial or hearing in an amount equal to the per diem charges of the reporter or reasonable charge attributable to the cost of operating the mechanical or electronic devices in accordance with §

19.2-165

, (ii) a fee of two dollars and fifty cents per charge, (iii) the fees of the attorney for the Commonwealth as provided for in §

15.2-1627.3

, (iv) the compensation of court-appointed counsel as provided in §

19.2-163

, (v) the fees of the public defenders as provided for in §

19.2-163

.2, (vi) the additional costs per charge imposed under §

19.2-368.18

to be deposited into the Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund, and (vii) in any court of record in which electronic devices are used for the purpose of recording testimony, a sum not to exceed twenty dollars for each day or part of a day of the trial to be paid by the clerk into a special fund to be used for the purpose of repairing, replacing or supplementing such electronic devices, or if a sufficient amount is available, to pay the purchase price of such devices in whole or in part. For the purpose of this subdivision, repairing shall include maintenance or service contracts”; deleted subdivision 10 d, which read: “In addition, a fee of twelve dollars shall be charged to a defendant found guilty in a criminal case in the circuit court as costs for (i) serving a warrant or summons other than on a witness when no arrest is made or (ii) making an arrest on a felony or misdemeanor charge, when such services are provided by the sheriff”; and in subdivision 32, inserted “except in cases in which costs are assessed pursuant to §§

17.1-275.1

, 17,1-275.2,

17.1-275.3

, or §

17.1-275.4

.”

The 1999 amendment by c. 1003 deleted “issuing any execution, and recording the return thereof, $1.50 and for” preceding “all services rendered” in subdivision A 7; deleted subdivision 10 a, which read: “Upon conviction in felony cases or when a felony defendant’s suspension of sentence and probation is revoked pursuant to §

19.2-306

, other than a revocation for failure to pay prior court costs, the clerk shall charge the defendant thirty-six dollars in each case, one dollar of which shall be forwarded to the State Treasurer for deposit in the Regional Criminal Justice Academy Training Fund as provided in § 9-178.2, to be used for financial support of the regional criminal justice training academies,” redesignated subdivision 10 b as present subdivision 10; in present subdivision 10, substituted “In any case” for “In addition, in each case,” deleted “(i)” preceding “a fee,” deleted “and” at the end of clause (i), and deleted clause (ii), which read: “a fee of $100 per case for any forensic laboratory analysis performed for use in prosecution of such violation which shall be taxed as costs to the defendant and shall be paid into the general fund of the state treasury”; deleted subdivision 10 c, which read: “In addition, in all felony cases, including the revocation of suspension of sentence and probation held pursuant to §

19.2-306

, other than a revocation for failure to pay prior court costs, the clerk shall collect and tax as costs (i) the expense of reporting or recording the trial or hearing in an amount equal to the per diem charges of the reporter or reasonable charge attributable to the cost of operating the mechanical or electronic devices in accordance with §

19.2-165

, (ii) a fee of two dollars and fifty cents per charge, (iii) the fees of the attorney for the Commonwealth as provided for in §

15.2-1627.3

, (iv) the compensation of court-appointed counsel as provided in §

19.2-163

, (v) the fees of the public defenders as provided for in §

19.2-163

.2, (vi) the additional costs per charge imposed under §

19.2-368.18

to be deposited into the Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund, and (vii) in any court of record in which electronic devices are used for the purpose of recording testimony, a sum not to exceed twenty dollars for each day or part of a day of the trial to be paid by the clerk into a special fund to be used for the purpose of repairing, replacing or supplementing such electronic devices, or if a sufficient amount is available, to pay the purchase price of such devices in whole or in part. For the purpose of this subdivision, repairing shall include maintenance or service contracts”; deleted subdivision 10 d, which read: “In addition, a fee of twelve dollars shall be charged to a defendant found guilty in a criminal case in the circuit court as costs for (i) serving a warrant or summons other than on a witness when no arrest is made or (ii) making an arrest on a felony or misdemeanor charge, when such services are provided by the sheriff”; deleted “or a summons for interrogation by an execution creditor” preceding “five dollars” in subdivision A 23; inserted “except in cases in which costs are assessed pursuant to §§

17.1-275.1

, 17.2-275.2, 17.2-275.3, or §

17.1-275.4

” in subdivision A 29; and added subdivisions A 44 and A 45.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 826 added subdivision A 13a.

The 2000 amendment by c. 830 substituted “§ 63.1-219.53” for “§ 63.1-236.1” near the end of subdivision A 29.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 481 and 501 are identical, and in subdivision A 27, inserted “including filing fees,” and deleted “in accordance with §

19.2-353.3

” preceding “the clerk shall.”

The 2001 amendment by c. 496, in subdivision A 2, substituted “fifteen dollars for an instrument or document consisting of ten or fewer pages or sheets; thirty dollars for an instrument or document consisting of 11 through 30 pages or sheets; and fifty dollars for an instrument or document consisting of 31 or more pages or sheets” for “thirteen dollars, including the fee of one dollar set forth in subdivision A 1 for up to four pages and one dollar for each page over four pages, and for recording plats too large to be recorded in the deed books, and for each sheet thereof, thirteen dollars,” deleted the former fourth sentence, which read: “In addition, a fee of one dollar shall be charged for indexing any document for each name indexed exceeding a total of ten in number,” and inserted “and fifty cents” in the present fourth sentence.

The 2001 amendment by c. 836 repealed subdivision A 36.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 831, effective July 1, 2003, deleted “of this section” following “subdivision A. 4.” in subdivision A 6; inserted “or is subject to a disposition under §

18.2-251

” in subdivision A 10; rewrote subdivision A 11; substituted “17.1-275.4,

17.1-275.7

,

17.1-275.8

, or §

17.1-275.9

” for “or §

17.1-275.4

” in subdivision A 32; deleted “10, 11” following “A. 7.” in subsection B; deleted subsection D and redesignated former subsections E and F as present subsections D and E; and inserted “A.” preceding the subdivision designations in present subsections B, C and D for clarification purposes.

The 2002 amendment by c. 832 repealed subdivisions A 1, A 19 and A 20; and in subdivision A 2, substituted “sixteen dollars” for “fifteen dollars” and “11 to 30” for “11 through 30” in the first sentence, deleted the former second sentence, which read: “This fee shall be in addition to the fee for recording a deed or other instrument recorded in conjunction with such plat sheet or sheets including the fee of one dollar set forth in subdivision A 1,” and inserted the present second and third sentences.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1004 inserted “and Treatment” in subdivisions A 10 and A 11 and made minor stylistic changes throughout subsection A.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 373 added the second through fifth sentences in subdivision A 8; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2005 amendment by c. 681, effective January 1, 2006, in subdivision A 13, rewrote the first and present second sentences and inserted “or a claim impleading a third-party defendant” in the present fourth sentence; substituted “for civil actions, for” for “for actions at law, for” in subdivision A 14; and in subdivision A 26, rewrote the first sentence, inserted the present second sentence and substituted “cross-claim or setoff” for “cross-bill” in the present third sentence; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 318 substituted “$10” for “$1” in subdivision A 35.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 623 and 718 are identical, and substituted “§

2.2-3704

” for “§

2.2-3701

” in subdivision A 8; in the first sentence of subdivision A 13 substituted “$60” for “$50,” “$110” for “$100” and “$160” for “$150,” and inserted “$10 of which shall be apportioned to the Courts Technology Fund established under §

17.1-132

” after each of these substitutions; and in the first sentence of subdivision A 26 substituted “$60” for “$50” and inserted “$10 of which shall be apportioned to the Courts Technology Fund established under §

17.1-132

.”

The 2006 amendment by c. 825, effective July 1, 2007, in subsection A, substituted “2.2-3704” for “2.2-3701” at the end of the next-to-last sentence in subdivision A 8; and added the last sentence in subdivision A 29.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 548 and 626 are identical, and in subdivision A 8, in the first sentence, inserted “record” following “paper,” “electronic” preceding “record,” “herein” preceding “a fee” and “or, if an electronic record, each image” at the end; and substituted “$0.50” for “$0.10” at the end of subdivision A 25.

The 2007 amendment by c. 646 repealed former subdivision A 33, which read: “For issuance of hunting and trapping permits in accordance with § 10.1-1154, $0.25.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 594 substituted “from the person presenting such credit card a reasonable convenience fee not to exceed” for “a service charge of” in subdivision A 27.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 874, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2011, c. 890, cl. 4, in subdivision A 13, rewrote the first sentence and added the second sentence.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 707, in the third sentence in subdivision A 26, added the clause (i) designation and clause (ii).

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 420 substituted “$50” for “$20” in subdivision A 28 and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2012 amendment by c. 714 added the second sentence of subdivision A 5, rewrote subdivision A 27, and inserted “or debit” in subdivision A 28; added subsection E, and redesignated former subsection E as F.

The 2012 amendment by c. 780, in subdivision A 27, inserted “or debit” twice and substituted “fee for the processing of such credit or debit card. Such convenience fee shall not exceed four percent of the amount paid for the transaction or a flat fee of $2 per transaction” for “fee not to exceed four percent of the amount paid” and added the last sentence; inserted “or debit” in subsection A 28, and added subsection E.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 263, in subdivision A 8, inserted “authorized under this section,” “costs included in the,” and “and the technology needed to operate electronic systems in the clerk’s office” in the fourth sentence; in subdivision A 28, substituted “of the payment” for “to be paid,” and deleted “in accordance with §

19.2-353.3

” at the end.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 282, effective January 1, 2015, in subdivision A 12 inserted “, a mature driver motor vehicle crash prevention course” following “traffic school.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 641 added the third and last sentences in subdivision A 27 and substituted “may collect” for “shall collect, if allowed by the court” in subdivision A 28.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 200 substituted “Virginia Birth Father Registry” for “Putative Father Registry” in subdivision A 29.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 68 and 589 are identical, and substituted “$5” for “$2” in subdivision A 39.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 69 and 653 are identical, and in subdivision A 2, substituted “$18” for “$16,” “$32” for “$30,” and “$52” for “$50” in the first sentence, “$17” for “$15” in the third sentence, and “Three dollars” for “One dollar” in the next to last sentence.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 427, effective July 1, 2021, deleted former subdivision A 35, which read “For filing the appointment of a resident agent for a nonresident property owner in accordance with §

55.1-1211

or

55.1-1401

, a fee of $10,” and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 377 substituted “subdivisions 4 and 5” for “subdivisions 5 and 6” in subdivision A 29.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on practice and pleading for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1500 (1970).

For survey on legal issues involving children in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 705 (1989).

For survey on property law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 773 (1989).

For survey on wills, trust, and estates in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 859 (1989).

For article, “Property Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 777 (2001).

For annual survey commentary, “The Merger of Common-Law and Equity Pleading in Virginia,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 77 (2006).

For annual survey article, “Civil Practice and Procedure,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 9 (2011).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8B M.J. Forgery, §§ 9, 24.

§ 17.1-275.1.
Fixed felony fee.

Upon conviction of any and each felony charge or upon a deferred disposition of proceedings in circuit court in the case of any and each felony disposition deferred pursuant to the terms and conditions of § 16.1-278.8, 16.1-278.9,

18.2-61

,

18.2-67.1

,

18.2-251

,

19.2-298.02

, or

19.2-303.6

, there shall be assessed as court costs a fee of $375, to be known as the fixed felony fee.

The amount collected, in whole or in part, for the fixed felony fee shall be apportioned, as provided by law, to the following funds in the fractional amounts designated:

Sentencing/supervision fee (General Fund) (.4705067);

Forensic science fund (.1033333);

Court reporter fund (.0887200);

Witness expenses/expert witness fund (.0053333);

Virginia Crime Victim-Witness Fund (.0080000);

Intensified Drug Enforcement Jurisdiction Fund (.0106667);

Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund (.0800000);

Commonwealth’s attorney fund (state share) (.0533333);

Commonwealth’s attorney fund (local share) (.0533333);

Regional Criminal Justice Academy Training Fund (.0026667);

Warrant fee (.0320000);

Courthouse construction/maintenance fund (.0053333); and

Clerk of the circuit court (.0867733).

History.

1999, c. 9; 2002, c. 831; 2003, c. 1039; 2005, c. 631; 2011, c. 565; 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 21.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 831, effective July 1, 2003, in the first paragraph, substituted “$373” for “$348”; and in the fixed felony fee table, deleted former entry 1, “Supervision fund,” added present entries 1 and 2, redesignated former entries 2 through 13 as present entries 3 through 14, respectively, and changed the fractional amounts for all, and added entries 15 and 16.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1039 deleted reference to §

19.2-303.2

and substituted “$350” for “$373” in the first paragraph and changed fractional amounts in the second paragraph.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 631 deleted “18.2-67.2:1” preceding “or

18.2-251

” in the first paragraph; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 565 rewrote the section, increasing the court cost fee and changing the fixed felony fees.

The 2020 Sp. Sess. I amendment.

The 2020 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 21, effective March 1, 2021, substituted “18.2-251,

19.2-298.02

, or

19.2-303.6

” for “or

18.2-251

” in the first paragraph.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Court cannot waive costs. —

A trial court has no authority to waive all or any portion of statutorily mandated court costs. Commonwealth v. Terembes, 54 Va. Cir. 193, 2000 Va. Cir. LEXIS 572 (Spotsylvania County 2000).

§ 17.1-275.2.
Fixed fee for felony reduced to misdemeanor.

In circuit court, upon the conviction of a person of any and each misdemeanor reduced from a felony charge, or upon a deferred disposition of proceedings in the case of any and each misdemeanor reduced from a felony charge and deferred pursuant to the terms and conditions of §

4.1-305

, 16.1-278.8, 16.1-278.9,

18.2-57.3

,

19.2-298.02

,

19.2-303.2

, or

19.2-303.6

, there shall be assessed as court costs a fee of $227, to be known as the fixed fee for felony reduced to misdemeanor. However, this section shall not apply to those proceedings provided for in §

17.1-275.8

.

The amount collected, in whole or in part, for the fixed fee for felony reduced to misdemeanor shall be apportioned to the following funds in the fractional amounts designated:

Sentencing/supervision fee (General Fund) (.1695154);

Forensic science fund (.1707048);

Court reporter fund (.1465639);

Witness expenses/expert witness fund (.0088106);

Virginia Crime Victim-Witness Fund (.0132159);

Intensified Drug Enforcement Jurisdiction Fund (.0176211);

Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund (.0881057);

Commonwealth’s attorney fund (state share) (.0881057);

Commonwealth’s attorney fund (local share) (.0881057);

Regional Criminal Justice Academy Training Fund (.0044053);

Warrant fee (.0528634);

Courthouse construction/maintenance fund (.0088106); and

Clerk of the circuit court (.1431718).

History.

1999, c. 9; 2002, c. 831; 2003, c. 1039; 2005, c. 631; 2011, c. 565; 2020, c. 1004; 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 21.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 831, effective July 1, 2003, in the first paragraph, rewrote the first sentence and added the second sentence; and in the fixed felony fee table, deleted former entry 1, “Supervision fund,” added present entries 1 and 2, and redesignated former entries 2 through 13 as 3 through 14, respectively.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1039 substituted “$202” for “$200” in the first paragraph and changed fractional amounts in the second paragraph.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 631 deleted “18.2-67.2:1” preceding “or

19.2-303.2

” in the first paragraph; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 565 rewrote the section, increasing the court cost fee and changing the fixed fees for felonies reduced to misdemeanors.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1004 substituted “19.2-303.2, or

19.2-303.6

” for “or

19.2-303.2

” in the first sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2020 Sp. Sess. I amendment.

The 2020 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 21, effective March 1, 2021, inserted “19.2-298.02” in the first paragraph.

§ 17.1-275.3.
Fixed felony revocation fee.

Upon the partial or full revocation of suspension of sentence or probation of a convicted felon pursuant to §

19.2-306

, other than a revocation for failure to pay previously assessed court costs, there shall be assessed as court costs a fee of $158 to be known as the fixed felony revocation fee. A single fixed felony revocation fee shall be assessed per defendant per hearing without regard to the number of revocations being considered.

The amount collected, in whole or in part, for the fixed felony revocation fee shall be apportioned to the following funds in the fractional amounts designated:

Virginia Crime Victim-Witness Fund (.0189873);

Intensified Drug Enforcement Jurisdiction Fund (.0253165);

Court reporter fund (.2105696);

Witness expenses/expert witness fund (.0126582);

Commonwealth’s attorney fund (state share) (.1265823);

Commonwealth’s attorney fund (local share) (.1265823);

Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund (.1898734);

Regional Criminal Justice Academy Training Fund (.0063291);

Warrant fee (.0759494); and

Clerk of the circuit court (.2071519).

History.

1999, c. 9; 2003, c. 1039; 2011, c. 565.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1039 substituted “$133” for “$131” in the first paragraph; and changed the fractional amounts in subdivisions 1 through 10.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 565 rewrote the section, increasing the court cost fee and changing the fixed felony revocation fees.